cs: Základní materiál pro kadidlo: Bambusové jádro (pro tyčinky); Základ z dřevěného uhlí; Jílový/minerální základ; Bylinný základ (rostlinná směs); Prášek joss; Prášek makko; Základ ze směsi pryskyřic; Základ z dřevěného prachu; Ostatní
sl-SI: Osnovni material za kadilo: Bambusovo jedro (za palčke); Osnova iz oglja; Osnova iz gline/mineralov; Zeliščna osnova (rastlinska mešanica); Prah joss; Prah makko; Osnova iz mešanice smol; Osnova iz lesnega prahu; Drugo
ru: Базовый материал благовоний: Бамбуковая основа (для палочек); Угольная основа; Глиняная/минеральная основа; Травяная основа (смесь растений); Пудра джосс; Пудра макко; Смесь смол; Древесная пудра; Другое
bg-BG: Материал на основата за тамян: Бамбукова сърцевина (за пръчици); Основа от въглен; Глинена/минерална основа; Билкова основа (растителна смес); Прах джос; Прах мако; Основа от смолиста смес; Основа от дървесен прах; Други
ro-RO: Materialul de bază pentru tămâie: Miez de bambus (pentru bețișoare); Bază de cărbune; Bază de argilă/minerală; Bază din ierburi (amestec de plante); Pudră Joss; Pudră Makko; Bază din amestec de rășină; Bază din pudră de lemn; Altele
el: Υλικό βάσης θυμιάματος: Πυρήνας μπαμπού (για στικ); Βάση κάρβουνου; Βάση από πηλό/ορυκτά; Βάση βοτάνων (μείγμα φυτών); Σκόνη joss; Σκόνη makko; Βάση από μείγμα ρητίνης; Βάση από σκόνη ξύλου; Άλλο
it: Materiale di base dell'incenso: Anima in bambù (per bastoncini); Base di carbone; Base di argilla/minerale; Base alle erbe (miscela di piante); Polvere di joss; Polvere di makko; Base di miscela di resina; Base di polvere di legno; Altro
ja: お香の素材: 竹芯 (スティック用); 炭ベース; 粘土/ミネラルベース; ハーブベース (植物ブレンド); ジョスパウダー; 抹香パウダー; 樹脂ブレンドベース; 木粉ベース; その他
zh-TW: 薰香基底材質: 竹芯 (適用於線香); 木炭基底; 黏土/礦物基底; 草本基底 (植物混合); 黏粉; 抹香粉; 樹脂混合基底; 木粉基底; 其他
tr: Tütsünün temel malzemesi: Bambu özü (çubuklar için); Kömür bazı; Kil/mineral bazı; Bitkisel baz (bitki karışımı); Joss tozu; Makko tozu; Reçine karışımı bazı; Ahşap tozu bazı; Diğer
vi: Vật liệu nền của hương: Lõi tre (dành cho nhang que); Gốc than củi; Gốc đất sét/khoáng chất; Gốc thảo mộc (hỗn hợp thực vật); Bột keo bời lời; Bột Makko; Gốc hỗn hợp nhựa cây; Gốc bột gỗ; Khác
th: วัสดุฐานสำหรับทำธูป: แกนไม้ไผ่ (สำหรับธูปก้าน); เบสถ่าน; เบสดินเหนียว/แร่; เบสสมุนไพร (พืชผสม); ผงยางบง; ผงมักโกะ; เบสเรซินผสม; เบสผงไม้; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Základná zložka kadidla: Bambusové jadro (pre tyčinky); Základ z dreveného uhlia; Hlinený/minerálny základ; Bylinný základ (zmes rastlín); Prášok joss; Prášok makko; Základ zo zmesi živíc; Základ z dreveného prášku; Iné
sv: Rökelsebasmaterial: Bambukärna (för rökelsepinnar); Träkolsbas; Ler-/mineralbas; Örtbas (växtblandning); Joss-pulver; Makko-pulver; Hartsblandningsbas; Träpulverbas; Övrigt
de: Basismaterial des Räucherwerks: Bambuskern (für Stäbchen); Holzkohlebasis; Ton-/Mineralbasis; Kräuterbasis (Pflanzenmischung); Joss-Pulver; Makko-Pulver; Harzmischungsbasis; Holzpulverbasis; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 香薰基底材料: 竹芯 (线香用); 碳基; 黏土/矿物基质; 草本基质 (植物混合); 粘粉; 末香粉; 树脂混合基质; 木粉基质; 其他
fi: Suitsukkeen päämateriaali: Bambusydän (tikuille); Hiilipohja; Savi-/mineraalipohja; Yrttipohja (kasviseos); Joss-jauhe; Makko-jauhe; Hartsiseospohja; Puujauhepohja; Muu
pl: Materiał bazowy kadzidła: Rdzeń bambusowy (do kadzidełek w patyczkach); Baza z węgla drzewnego; Baza gliniana/mineralna; Baza ziołowa (mieszanka roślinna); Proszek Joss; Proszek Makko; Baza z żywicy; Baza z mączki drzewnej; Inne
da: Basismateriale i røgelse: Bambuskerne (til pinde); Trækulsbase; Ler-/mineralbase; Urtebase (planteblanding); Joss-pulver; Makko-pulver; Harpiksblandingsbase; Træpulverbase; Andet
hr-HR: Materijal za bazu tamjana: Jezgra od bambusa (za štapiće); Baza od ugljena; Baza od gline/minerala; Biljna baza (mješavina biljaka); Joss prah; Makko prah; Baza od mješavine smola; Baza od drvenog praha; Ostalo
ko: 향의 기본 재료: 대나무 코어(스틱용); 숯 베이스; 점토/광물 베이스; 허브 베이스(식물 블렌드); 죠스 파우더; 마코 파우더; 레진 블렌드 베이스; 목재 파우더 베이스; 기타
fr: Matière de base de l’encens: Cœur de bambou (pour bâtonnets); Base de charbon; Base d’argile/minérale; Base aux herbes (mélange de plantes); Poudre de Joss; Poudre de Makko; Base de mélange de résines; Base de poudre de bois; Autre
pt-PT: Material base para incenso: Núcleo de bambu (para varetas); Base de carvão; Base de argila/mineral; Base de ervas (mistura de plantas); Pó de joss; Pó de makko; Base de mistura de resinas; Base de pó de madeira; Outro
en: Incense base material: Bamboo core (for sticks); Charcoal base; Clay/mineral base; Herbal base (plant blend); Joss powder; Makko powder; Resin blend base; Wood powder base; Other
es: Material base para incienso: Núcleo de bambú (para varillas); Base de carbón; Base de arcilla/mineral; Base herbal (mezcla de plantas); Polvo joss; Polvo makko; Base de mezcla de resinas; Base de polvo de madera; Otra
nb: Røkelsesbasismateriale: Bambuskjerne (for pinner); Kullbase; Leire-/mineralbase; Urtebase (planteblanding); Joss-pulver; Makko-pulver; Harpiksblanding-base; Trepulver-base; Annet
hu: Füstölő alapanyaga: Bambusz mag (pálcikákhoz); Faszén alapú; Agyag/ásványi alapú; Gyógynövény alapú (növényi keverék); Joss por; Makko por; Gyantakeverék alapú; Fapor alapú; Egyéb
pt-BR: Incenso material da base: Núcleo de bambu (para varetas); Base de carvão; Base de argila/mineral; Base de ervas (mistura de plantas); Pó de joss; Pó de makko; Base de mistura de resinas; Base de pó de madeira; Outro
lt-LT: Smilkalų pagrindo medžiaga: Bambuko šerdis (lazdelėms); Anglies pagrindas; Molio / mineralų pagrindas; Žolelių pagrindas (augalų mišinys); Joss pudra; Mako pudra; Dervų mišinio pagrindas; Medžio pudros pagrindas; Kita
nl: Wierookbasis materiaal: Bamboekern (voor stokjes); Houtskoolbasis; Klei-/minerale basis; Kruidenbasis (plantenmengsel); Joss-poeder; Makko-poeder; Harsmengselbasis; Houtpoederbasis; Overig